Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.110.050

Violation of chapter.

A violation of this chapter shall constitute an unfair practice under chapter 49.60 RCW, the law against discrimination. All rights and remedies under chapter 49.60 RCW, including the right to file a complaint with the human rights commission and to bring a civil action, shall apply.

[ 1989 c 341 s 5.]